Wyoming, session 2026, HB0129.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 33-26-801 through 33-26-805 are
created to read:

ARTICLE 8
EXPANDING PHYSICIAN ACCESS ACT

33-26-801. Short title.
HB0129

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0373

This article shall be known and may be cited as the
"Expanding Physician Access Act."

33-26-802. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Board" means the Wyoming board of medicine;

(ii) "Health care provider" means a facility
that furnishes, bills or is paid for health care procedures
or service delivery in the normal course of business and
includes but is not limited to health systems, hospitals,
hospital-based facilities, freestanding emergency
facilities, medical clinics and urgent care clinics;

(iii) "Internationally trained physician" means
a person who:

(A) Has been granted a medical doctorate or
substantially similar degree by a domestic or international
HB0129

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0373
medical program of good standing as determined and approved
by the board;

(B) Has been licensed in good standing with
a medical licensing or regulatory institution of the
person's licensing country at all times in the preceding
five (5) years and does not have any pending investigations
or discipline before the licensing body;

(C) Has completed a residency or
substantially similar post-graduate medical training
program or has practiced as a medical professional
performing the duties of a physician in the person's
licensing country for not less than seven (7) continuous
years after the completion of a medical doctorate;

(D) If the person has completed a
residency, has provided written verification that the
person practiced medicine as a fully licensed physician in
the person's licensing country for not less than five (5)
years after the completion of residency training, or if the
person did not complete a residency training, that the
person has practiced medicine as a fully licensed physician
HB0129

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0373
in the person's licensing country for not less than twelve
(12) years after completion of a medical doctorate or a
residency equivalent pursuant to subparagraph (C) of this
paragraph;

(E) Possesses fluency in the English
language in the context of the provision of health care as
demonstrated by certification by the educational commission
of foreign medical graduates or other test designated by
board rule;

(F) Has submitted all necessary forms and
releases for the board to conduct an international criminal
background check on the physician before issuance of a
provisional license under this act; and

(G) Has passed steps one (1) and two (2) of
either the United States medical licensing examination or
the comprehensive osteopathic medical licensing examination
in not more than three (3) attempts for each part.

(iv) "Licensing country" means any foreign
country as designated by board rule where an
HB0129

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0373
internationally trained physician is licensed and where the
board has determined that medical licensing is adequate and
in good standing;

(v) "Supervising physician" means a person who:

(A) Holds a full and unrestricted license
in good standing issued by the board to practice medicine
in Wyoming and has held the license for not less than the
immediately preceding three (3) years;

(B) Has not been disciplined by a medical
licensing board in any state;

(C) Is not under investigation by the board
or any other state's medical licensing board;

(D) Is certified in good and active
standing by the American board of medical specialties, the
American osteopathic association board of specialties or
other national board specified by rule of the board;

HB0129

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0373
(E) Meets any other requirements set forth
by rule of the board which rule the board determines is
useful or necessary to determine the good standing and
competency of the physician; and

(F) Is approved to supervise an
internationally trained physician in advance by the board.

33-26-803. State license for internationally trained
physicians.

(a) The board may grant a provisional license to
practice medicine in Wyoming to an internationally trained
physician who has a written offer of employment as a
physician at any health care provider that operates in
Wyoming. Before issuing the provisional license, the board
shall require an internationally trained physician to
complete an application form provided and approved by the
board, pass an international criminal background check
investigation, meet all requirements set forth in this
article and in rules adopted by the board and pay all fees
required by the board. The board:

HB0129

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0373
(i) Shall not grant a provisional license to
practice medicine in this state to any internationally
trained physician unless the physician is eligible to
obtain federal immigration status that allows the physician
to practice in the United States;

(ii) May suspend a provisional license granted
under this subsection if the internationally trained
physician is not employed by a health care provider that
operates in this state during the provisional license
period. If the internationally trained physician loses
employment with the health care provider, the license shall
be suspended until the internationally trained physician
obtains employment with another Wyoming health care
provider. If the internationally trained physician cannot
obtain required employment within six (6) months, the
provisional license shall be revoked.

(b) The board may suspend or revoke a provisional
license granted under subsection (a) of this section
pursuant to W.S. 33-26-401 through 33-26-410. Licensees may
appeal the suspension or revocation of a provisional
HB0129

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0373
license in accordance with the requirements of W.S.
33-26-401 through 33-26-410.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the holder of a
provisional license issued under this article shall be
eligible to apply to convert the license to a full,
unrestricted license to practice medicine in this state
after three (3) years of continuous, successful active
practice in this state if the licensee:

(i) Has not been disciplined under W.S.
33-26-401 through 33-26-410;

(ii) Has followed all of the board's rules and
regulations under the medical practice act; and

(iii) Has passed step three (3) of the United
States medical licensing examination or the comprehensive
osteopathic medical licensing examination in not more than
three (3) attempts.

(d) Provisional license holders shall comply with the
continuing medical education requirements and any other
HB0129

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0373
requirements for practicing physicians as set forth by the
board's rules and this article.

(e) Nothing in this section shall require the board
to license, on a provisional or full basis, an
internationally trained physician without evidence of full
compliance with the requirements of this article and rules
set forth by the board.

(f) Internationally trained physicians who are
required to obtain federal work authorization before
commencing any work for the sponsoring health care provider
are eligible to apply for a provisional license prior to
receiving federal work authorization but shall not commence
work under the provisional license without the required
work authorization. The provisional license shall be under
a nondisciplinary suspension until the board receives
documentation demonstrating the holder's authorization to
work in the United States. Upon receipt by the board of
such documentation, the suspension of the provisional
license shall be lifted with no additional action required
by the board after the board notifies the internationally
trained physician that the suspension has been lifted.
HB0129

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0373

(g) Internationally trained physicians who become
licensed under subsection (a) of this section shall not be
required to maintain employment with the original
sponsoring health care provider.

33-26-804. Supervision requirements for
internationally trained physicians.

(a) An internationally trained physician's
supervising physician, as approved by the board under this
article, shall submit monthly reports to the board on the
internationally trained physician's supervision and
performance on a form or format designated by board rule.

(b) A health care provider employing a physician
holding a provisional license under this article shall
submit monthly reports to the board on the internationally
trained physician's performance on a form or format
designated by board rule. If the supervising physician is
employed by the sponsoring health care provider, the
requirements of this subsection shall be considered met
HB0129

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0373
upon submission of the supervising physician's monthly
report as set forth in subsection (a) of this section.

(c) If a supervising physician fails to submit a
satisfactory report as set forth by subsection (a) of this
section, the supervising physician shall be considered to
be in violation of this article and the provisional license
shall be automatically suspended until the supervising
physician submits all missing reports to the board within
thirty (30) days of receiving notice of the missing
reports.

33-26-805. Protection of the public.

(a) The holder of a provisional license shall not
practice outside of the supervision of a supervising
physician.

(b) The holder of a provisional license shall submit
and keep on file with the board written proof of liability
insurance in an amount and type to be set by board rule. If
at any time the liability insurance covering a provisional
license holder lapses or is otherwise compromised in any
HB0129

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0373
way, the provisional license holder and supervising
physician shall notify the board in writing and within two
(2) business days of the lapse or other situation. The
provisional license shall be immediately and automatically
suspended and shall remain so until satisfactory, written
proof of coverage by professional liability insurance as
set forth in this article is provided to the board.

(c) The holder of a provisional license and the
supervising physician shall notify the board in writing of
the termination of the holder's employment or supervising
arrangement, whether or not the termination was for cause.
Upon termination of the holder's employment or supervision,
the provisional license shall be immediately and
automatically suspended, and shall remain so until all
requirements of this article are met.

(d) For the first year beginning on the date of
issuance of a provisional license, where the holder of the
license is engaged in patient contact, the supervising
physician shall be in the same physical facility as the
holder of the provisional license to provide immediate
supervision to ensure patient safety.
HB0129

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0373

(e) Beginning upon the first anniversary of the
issuance of a provisional license, and for the remaining
time an internationally trained physician holds a
provisional license, when the holder has patient contact,
the supervising physician shall be available within fifteen
(15) minutes to consult with and supervise the holder. This
consultation and supervision may be done via telephone,
videoconference or other mode allowing real time two (2)
way communication between the holder and the supervising
physician.

(f) For the first year beginning on the date of
issuance of a provisional license, the holder of the
provisional license shall only prescribe controlled
substances with the signature of the supervising physician.
Upon completion of the first year after issuance of a
provisional license, the holder of the provisional license
may prescribe controlled substances subject to all laws of
Wyoming and the United States, and with regular review of
all controlled substance prescriptions by the supervising
physician.

HB0129

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0373
(g) The holder of a provisional license under this
article may not supervise the practice of medicine by a
physician assistant.

Section 2. W.S. 7-19-106(a)(xxiii), 33-26-102(a)(x),
33-26-202(b) by creating a new paragraph (xx), 33-26-301(b)
by creating a new paragraph (ix), 33-26-303 by creating a
new subsection (e), 33-26-305(a), 33-26-401(e),
33-26-402(a) by creating a new paragraph (xxxvii) and
35-1-401(a)(x) are amended to read:

7-19-106. Access to, and dissemination of,
information.

(a) Criminal history record information shall be
disseminated by criminal justice agencies in this state,
whether directly or through any intermediary, only to:

(xxiii) The board of medicine for purposes of
obtaining background information on applicants, including
applicants who are internationally trained physicians under
W.S. 33-26-801 through 33-26-805, for licensure or
certification by the board, whose application or other
HB0129

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0373
information received by the board indicates the applicant
has or may have been convicted of a crime, and for purposes
of investigation of complaints and disciplinary action
against licensees of the board;

33-26-102. Definitions.

(a) As used in this chapter:

(x) "Licensee" means any person licensed by the
board under this chapter, including a person granted a
provisional license under W.S. 33-26-801 through 33-26-805;

33-26-202. Board; duties; general powers.

(b) The board is empowered and directed to:

(xx) Adopt rules and regulations regarding
granting internationally trained physicians provisional
licenses, and the practice of medicine by the holder of
such license, pursuant to W.S. 33-26-801 through 33-26-805.

33-26-301. License required.
HB0129

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0373

(b) Upon appropriate application, fulfillment of
eligibility criteria and successful completion of all other
requirements, the board may grant:

(ix) A provisional license to an internationally
trained physician pursuant to W.S. 33-26-801 through
33-26-805.

33-26-303. Requirements for granting license.

(e) Notwithstanding the requirements of this section,
the board may grant a provisional license to practice
medicine in this state to an internationally trained
physician pursuant to the requirements of W.S. 33-26-801
through 33-26-805.

33-26-305. Annual renewal; expiration; reactivation
of lapsed and inactive licenses; restoration of emeritus
licenses to active status; duplicates.

(a) All licenses granted under this chapter other
than temporary licenses and medical training licenses shall
HB0129

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0373
lapse annually on a date or dates to be established by
rules adopted by the board. A licensee may renew his
license each year by submitting a renewal application
containing information required by the board, accompanied
by proof of compliance with and fulfillment of continuing
medical education requirements of the board in the manner
set forth in the board’s continuing medical education rules
and regulations and a renewal fee to the board in an amount
set by the board pursuant to W.S. 33-26-307. The licensee,
including the holder of a provisional license under W.S.
33-26-801 through 33-26-805, additionally shall report any
investigative or disciplinary action pending or taken by a
state examining board, a health care entity or the
grievance committee of a medical society during the
preceding year.

33-26-401. Board duties; investigation; interview.

(e) The board retains jurisdiction over only those
licensees to whom provisional licenses under W.S. 33-26-801
through 33-26-805, temporary or full licenses were granted
and who are subject to ongoing investigation by the board,
regardless of whether the license expired, lapsed or was
HB0129

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0373
relinquished during or after the alleged occurrence of
conduct proscribed by W.S. 33-26-402 by the licensee.

33-26-402. Grounds for suspension; revocation;
restriction; imposition of conditions; refusal to renew or
other disciplinary action.

(a) The board may refuse to renew, and may revoke,
suspend or restrict a license or take other disciplinary
action, including the imposition of conditions or
restrictions upon a license on one (1) or more of the
following grounds:

(xxxvii) Violating the provisions of W.S.
33-26-801 through 33-26-805.

35-1-401. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(x) "Physician" means a person authorized or
licensed to practice medicine as provided in W.S. 33-26-101
through 33-26-601 33-26-805;
HB0129

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0373

Section 3. The state board of medicine shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

Section 4.

(a) Except as provided by subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.

(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0129